nb: Konsolltilbehør inkludert: Bærevesker; Ladekabel; Kontroller; Dokk; Spill; HDMI-kabel; Hodesett; Minnekort; Strømkabel; Stativ; Annet
hu: Konzoltartozékok mellékelve: Hordtáska; Töltőkábel; Vezérlő; Dokk; Játékok; HDMI kábel; Fejhallgató; Memóriakártya; Tápkábel; Álló; Egyéb
tr: Konsol dahil aksesuarlar: Taşıma çantası; Şarj kablosu; Oyun kolu; Dok; Oyunlar; HDMI kablosu; Kulaklık; Hafıza kartı; Güç kablosu; Stant; Diğer
zh-TW: 包含的遊戲機配件: 行李箱; 充電線; 控制器; 底座; 遊戲; HDMI 線; 一副耳機; 記憶卡; 電源線; 立架; 其他
nl: Console accessoires inbegrepen: Draagtas; Oplaadkabel; Controller; Dock; Games; HDMI-kabel; Headset; Geheugenkaart; Stroomkabel; Standaard; Andere
ja: コンソール付属アクセサリー: 持ち運び用ケース; 充電ケーブル; コントローラー; ドック; ゲーム; HDMIケーブル; ヘッドセット; メモリーカード; 電源ケーブル; スタンド; その他
vi: Phụ kiện máy console được bao gồm: Hộp đựng; Cáp sạc; Bộ điều khiển; Đế; Trò chơi; Cáp HDMI; Tai nghe có micrô; Thẻ nhớ; Cáp nguồn; Giá đỡ; Khác
zh-CN: 游戏机包含的配件: 手提箱; 充电线; 手柄; 底座; 游戏; HDMI 线; 耳机; 存储卡; 电源线; 支架; 其他
sk-SK: Príslušenstvo konzoly v balení: Puzdro na prenášanie; Nabíjací kábel; Ovládač; Dok; Hry; HDMI kábel; Náhlavná súprava; Pamäťová karta; Napájací kábel; Stojan; Iné
de: Enthaltene Konsolenzubehörteile: Transporttasche; Ladekabel; Controller; Dock; Spiele; HDMI-Kabel; Headset; Speicherkarte; Stromkabel; Ständer; Sonstiges
da: Konsoltilbehør inkluderet: Bæretaske; Ladekablel; Controller; Dock; Spil; HDMI-kabel; Headset; Hukommelseskort; Strømkabel; Stativ; Andet
lt-LT: Įtraukti konsolės priedai: Nešiojamas dėklas; Įkrovimo kabelis; Valdiklis; Dokas; Žaidimai; HDMI kabelis; Ausinės; Atminties kortelė; Maitinimo kabelis; Stovas; Kita
it: Accessori console inclusi: Valigetta; Cavo di ricarica; Controller; Dock; Giochi; Cavo HDMI; Cuffia; Memory card; Cavo di alimentazione; Supporto; Altro
ru: Аксессуары консоли в комплекте: Чехол для переноски; Зарядный кабель; Контроллер; Док-станция; Игры; Кабель HDMI; Гарнитура; Карта памяти; Кабель питания; Подставка; Другой
ko: 콘솔 포함 액세서리: 휴대용 케이스; 충전 케이블; 컨트롤러; 도크; 게임; HDMI 케이블; 헤드셋; 메모리 카드; 전원 케이블; 스탠드; 기타
sl-SI: Vključeni dodatki konzole: Torba za prenašanje; Polnilni kabel; Krmilnik; Postaja; Igre; HDMI kabel; Naglavne slušalke; Pomnilniška kartica; Napajalni kabel; Stojalo; Drugo
es: Accesorios de consola incluidos: Estuche de transporte; Cable de carga; Controlador; Base; Juegos; Cable HDMI; Auriculares; Tarjeta de memoria; Cable de alimentación; Soporte; Otros
cs: Příslušenství konzole v balení: Přepravní kufřík; Nabíjecí kabel; Ovladač; Dok; Hry; HDMI kabel; Headset; Paměťová karta; Napájecí kabel; Stojan; Jiné
ro-RO: Accesorii consolă incluse: Geantă de transport; Cablu de încărcare; Unitate de control; Dock; Jocuri; Cablu HDMI; Căști; Card de memorie; Cablu de alimentare; Suport; Altele
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมคอนโซลที่รวมอยู่: กระเป๋าพกพา; สายชาร์จ; คอนโทรลเลอร์; ด็อก; เกม; สาย HDMI; ชุดหูฟัง; การ์ดหน่วยความจำ; สายไฟ; ที่ตั้ง; อื่นๆ
sv: Ingående konsoltillbehör: Bärfodral; Laddningskabel; Kontroll; Dockningsstation; Spel; HDMI-kabel; Headset; Minneskort; Strömkabel; Stativ; Övrigt
hr-HR: Uključeni dodaci za konzolu: Torba za nošenje; Kabel za punjenje; Kontrolor; Priključna stanica; Igre; HDMI kabel; Slušalice s mikrofonom; Memorijska kartica; Kabel za napajanje; Stalak; Ostalo
pt-PT: Acessórios da consola incluídos: Caixa de transporte; Cabo de carregamento; Comando; Dock; Jogos; Cabo HDMI; Auscultadores; Cartão de memória; Cabo de alimentação; Suporte; Outro
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари за конзола: Калъф за пренасяне; Кабел за зареждане; Контролер; Док; Игри; HDMI кабел; Слушалки; Карта памет; Захранващ кабел; Стойка; Други
fi: Konsolin mukana tulevat lisävarusteet: Kantokotelo; Latausjohto; Ohjain; Telakka; Pelit; HDMI-kaapeli; Kuulokkeet; Muistikortti; Virtajohto; Jalusta; Muu
fr: Accessoires de console inclus: Pochette de transport; Câble de chargement; Manette; Station d'accueil; Jeux; Câble HDMI; Casque; Carte mémoire; Câble d'alimentation; Support; Autre
pl: Akcesoria konsoli w zestawie: Etui; Kabel do ładowania; Kontroler; Stacja dokująca; Gry; Kabel HDMI; Słuchawki nagłowne; Karta pamięci; Kabel zasilający; Statyw; Inne
en: Console accessories included: Carrying case; Charging cable; Controller; Dock; Games; HDMI cable; Headset; Memory card; Power cable; Stand; Other
pt-BR: Acessórios de console incluídos: Maleta; Cabos de carregamento; Controlador; Dock; Jogos; Cabo HDMI; Fone de ouvido; Cartão de memória; Cabo de energia; Suporte; Outro
el: Αξεσουάρ κονσόλας που περιλαμβάνονται: Θήκη μεταφοράς; Καλώδιο φόρτισης; Ελεγκτής; Βάση; Παιχνίδια; Καλώδιο HDMI; Κάσκα ακουστικών; Κάρτα μνήμης; Καλώδιο τροφοδοσίας; Κατακόρυφη; Άλλο